Maryland, session 2026, SB0888.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
(Three–fifths of all the members elected to each of the two Houses concurring), That it be
proposed that the Maryland Constitution read as follows:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0888*

SENATE BILL 888
Article III – Legislative Department
4.
Each legislative district FOR THE ELECTION OF A MEMBER OF THE SENATE AND
MEMBERS OF THE HOUSE OF DELEGATES shall consist of adjoining territory, be compact
in form, and of substantially equal population. Due regard shall be given to natural
boundaries and the boundaries of political subdivisions.
62.
THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY SHALL HAVE THE POWER TO GRANT ORIGINAL
JURISDICTION TO THE SUPREME COURT OF MARYLAND TO REVIEW THE
CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTING OF THE STATE.
Article XVIII – Provisions of Limited Duration
6.
(A) (1) THIS SECTION SHALL APPLY ONLY TO ELECTIONS FOR THE
STATE’S REPRESENTATIVES IN CONGRESS THAT ARE HELD AFTER THE STATEWIDE
GENERAL ELECTION HELD IN 2026 AND BEFORE THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF
LEGISLATION ESTABLISHING DISTRICTS FOR THE ELECTION OF THE STATE’S
REPRESENTATIVES IN CONGRESS FOLLOWING THE 2030 DECENNIAL CENSUS.
(2) THIS SECTION TEMPORARILY IS PART OF ARTICLE III –
LEGISLATIVE DEPARTMENT, SECTION 49 OF THE CONSTITUTION.
(3) THIS SECTION SHALL EXPIRE ON THE EFFECTIVE DATE OF
LEGISLATION ESTABLISHING DISTRICTS FOR THE ELECTION OF THE STATE’S
REPRESENTATIVES IN CONGRESS FOLLOWING THE 2030 DECENNIAL CENSUS.
(B) THE STATE IS DIVIDED INTO EIGHT DISTRICTS FOR THE ELECTION OF
THE STATE’S REPRESENTATIVES IN CONGRESS.
(C) (1) THE DESCRIPTIONS OF CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS IN THIS
SECTION INCLUDE THE REFERENCES INDICATED.
(2) (I) THE REFERENCES TO:
1. ELECTION DISTRICTS AND WARDS ARE TO THE
GEOGRAPHICAL BOUNDARIES OF THE ELECTION DISTRICTS AND WARDS AS THEY
EXISTED ON JANUARY 13, 2026; AND

SENATE BILL 888 3
2. PRECINCTS ARE TO THE GEOGRAPHICAL
BOUNDARIES OF THE PRECINCTS AS THEY EXISTED ON JANUARY 13, 2026, AND AS
REVIEWED AND CORRECTED BY THE MARYLAND DEPARTMENT OF PLANNING.
(II) WHERE PRECINCTS ARE SPLIT BETWEEN CONGRESSIONAL
DISTRICTS, CENSUS TRACT AND BLOCK NUMBERS, AS INDICATED IN P.L. 94–171
DATA OR SHOWN ON THE P.L. 94–171 CENSUS BLOCK MAPS PROVIDED BY THE U.S.
BUREAU OF THE CENSUS AND REFERRED TO IN THIS SECTION, ARE USED TO DEFINE
THE BOUNDARIES OF CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICTS.
(D) (1) THE FIRST CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT CONSISTS OF THE
FOLLOWING COUNTIES:
(I) CAROLINE COUNTY;
(II) DORCHESTER COUNTY;
(III) KENT COUNTY;
(IV) QUEEN ANNE’S COUNTY;
(V) SOMERSET COUNTY;
(VI) TALBOT COUNTY;
(VII) WICOMICO COUNTY; AND
(VIII) WORCESTER COUNTY.
(2) THE DISTRICT ALSO INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING PARTS OF ANNE
ARUNDEL COUNTY:
(I) ELECTION DISTRICT 4;
(II) ELECTION DISTRICT 1, PRECINCTS 5, 6, 19 THROUGH 25, 98,
AND 99;
(III) ELECTION DISTRICT 2, PRECINCTS 1, 4, 9, 21, 23, AND 24;
(IV) ELECTION DISTRICT 5, PRECINCTS 1, 2, 17, 18, 20, 22, 25,
26, 28, 30, 32, AND 35 THROUGH 37;
(V) ELECTION DISTRICT 6, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 10, 12

SENATE BILL 888
THROUGH 16, 18 THROUGH 23, AND 25 THROUGH 35;
(VI) ELECTION DISTRICT 7, PRECINCTS 17, 18, 20, 24, AND 99;
(VII) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 1, PRECINCT 7 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 7512.00, BLOCKS 2034 THROUGH 2036 AND 2039
THROUGH 2041;
(VIII) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 1, PRECINCT 9 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 7508.01, BLOCKS 4010, 4018, 4019,
AND 4025 THROUGH 4030; AND
2. CENSUS TRACT 9800.00, BLOCKS 1010 THROUGH
1015, 1017, 1018, AND 1020;
(IX) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 2, PRECINCT 7 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 7402.04, BLOCKS 2000 AND 2001;
2. CENSUS TRACT 7509.00, BLOCKS 3032 THROUGH
3035; AND
3. CENSUS TRACT 7514.00, BLOCKS 2000 THROUGH
2009, 2011 THROUGH 2031, 2036, 2040, 2046, AND 2047;
(X) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 2, PRECINCT 17 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 7410.00, BLOCKS 2000 THROUGH 2010, 2020, AND
2021;
(XI) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 5, PRECINCT 23 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 7308.00, BLOCKS 1015 THROUGH 1019 AND 1021
THROUGH 1036;
(XII) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 5, PRECINCT 27 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 7311.06, BLOCK 2006;
(XIII) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 6, PRECINCT 24 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 7026.02, BLOCKS 1003, 1004, 1006

SENATE BILL 888 5
THROUGH 1063, 3011 THROUGH 3019, AND 3021; AND
2. CENSUS TRACT 9900.00, BLOCKS 25, 29, 30, AND 46;
(XIV) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 7, PRECINCT 13 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 7517.00, BLOCKS 1022, 1024, 1026, AND 1027; AND
(XV) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 7, PRECINCT 15 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 7022.04, BLOCK 1000; AND
2. CENSUS TRACT 7022.05, BLOCKS 1000, 1006
THROUGH 1008, 2016, 3000, 3002, AND 3005.
(3) THE DISTRICT ALSO INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING PARTS OF
HOWARD COUNTY:
(I) ELECTION DISTRICT 6;
(II) ELECTION DISTRICT 1, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 3, 6
THROUGH 9, 12 THROUGH 18, AND 21; AND
(III) ELECTION DISTRICT 5, PRECINCTS 5, 6, AND 20.
(E) (1) THE SECOND CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT CONSISTS OF THE
FOLLOWING PARTS OF ANNE ARUNDEL COUNTY:
(I) ELECTION DISTRICT 3;
(II) ELECTION DISTRICT 1, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 4, 8, AND 10
THROUGH 18;
(III) ELECTION DISTRICT 2, PRECINCTS 2, 3, 5, 6, 8, 10 THROUGH
16, 18 THROUGH 20, AND 22;
(IV) ELECTION DISTRICT 5, PRECINCTS 3 THROUGH 16, 19, 21,
24, 29, 31, 33, AND 34;
(V) ELECTION DISTRICT 6, PRECINCTS 11 AND 17;
(VI) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 1, PRECINCT 7 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:

SENATE BILL 888
1. CENSUS TRACT 7503.00, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1013, 2000 THROUGH 2011, AND 2014 THROUGH 2016; AND
2. CENSUS TRACT 7512.00, BLOCKS 2000 THROUGH
2009, 2011 THROUGH 2015, 2023, 2024, 2030 THROUGH 2033, 2042, AND 2043;
(VII) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 1, PRECINCT 9 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 7508.01, BLOCKS 1007 THROUGH
1010, 3009, 3010, 3012 THROUGH 3019, 4000 THROUGH 4009, 4011 THROUGH 4017,
4020 THROUGH 4024, AND 4031; AND
2. CENSUS TRACT 9800.00, BLOCKS 1001, 1002, 1008,
AND 1016;
(VIII) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 2, PRECINCT 7 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 7304.01, BLOCKS 2000 THROUGH
2010, 2012, AND 3000 THROUGH 3023;
2. CENSUS TRACT 7402.05, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1004;
3. CENSUS TRACT 7509.00, BLOCKS 2026, 2036, 2037,
2045 THROUGH 2049, 2056, 2057, 3009 THROUGH 3011, 3014, 3029 THROUGH 3031,
AND 3036; AND
4. CENSUS TRACT 7514.00, BLOCK 2010;
(IX) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 2, PRECINCT 17 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 7305.10, BLOCKS 2005 AND 2008
THROUGH 2012;
2. CENSUS TRACT 7305.12, BLOCKS 1002 THROUGH
1004 AND 1006;
3. CENSUS TRACT 7305.13, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1003 AND 2000 THROUGH 2010; AND

SENATE BILL 888 7
4. CENSUS TRACT 7305.14, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1011 AND 2000 THROUGH 2005;
(X) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 5, PRECINCT 23 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 7308.00, BLOCKS 1002 AND 1005 THROUGH 1013; AND
(XI) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 5, PRECINCT 27 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 7311.06, BLOCKS 1000, 1002, 1003,
2002 THROUGH 2005, AND 2013; AND
2. CENSUS TRACT 7311.07, BLOCKS 2013, 2017, AND
2018.
(2) THE DISTRICT ALSO INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING PARTS OF
BALTIMORE CITY:
(I) WARDS 1, 2, 23, AND 24;
(II) WARD 3, PRECINCT 3;
(III) WARD 6, PRECINCT 5;
(IV) WARD 25, PRECINCTS 5 THROUGH 16;
(V) WARD 26, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 14 AND 34; AND
(VI) THAT PART OF WARD 21, PRECINCT 4 THAT CONSISTS OF
CENSUS TRACT 2101.00, BLOCK 1039.
(3) THE DISTRICT ALSO INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING PARTS OF
BALTIMORE COUNTY:
(I) ELECTION DISTRICTS 12 AND 15;
(II) ELECTION DISTRICT 1, PRECINCTS 2 THROUGH 4, 10
THROUGH 15, 17, 18, 20, AND 22;
(III) ELECTION DISTRICT 2, PRECINCTS 8, 11 THROUGH 14, 16
THROUGH 18, 20, 24, 25, 30, AND 32;

SENATE BILL 888
(IV) ELECTION DISTRICT 11, PRECINCT 24; AND
(V) ELECTION DISTRICT 13, PRECINCTS 2 THROUGH 9.
(4) THE DISTRICT ALSO INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING PARTS OF
HARFORD COUNTY:
(I) ELECTION DISTRICT 6;
(II) ELECTION DISTRICT 1, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 3, 5, AND 10
THROUGH 22;
(III) ELECTION DISTRICT 2, PRECINCTS 3 THROUGH 10;
(IV) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 2, PRECINCT 1 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 3022.00, BLOCK 2034;
(V) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 2, PRECINCT 2 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 3022.00, BLOCK 2019; AND
(VI) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 3, PRECINCT 9 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 3034.00, BLOCKS 2011 AND 2012.
(F) (1) THE THIRD CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT CONSISTS OF CECIL
COUNTY.
(2) THE DISTRICT ALSO INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING PARTS OF
BALTIMORE CITY:
(I) WARD 13, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 4 AND 12;
(II) WARD 27, PRECINCTS 38 THROUGH 47, 49, 50, 62 THROUGH
67, AND 69;
(III) THAT PART OF WARD 12, PRECINCT 1 THAT CONSISTS OF
THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 1201.00, BLOCKS 2000 THROUGH
2007, 3000 THROUGH 3002, 4000, AND 4001; AND
2. CENSUS TRACT 2711.02, BLOCK 1028;
(IV) THAT PART OF WARD 12, PRECINCT 4 THAT CONSISTS OF

SENATE BILL 888 9
CENSUS TRACT 1201.00, BLOCK 4002;
(V) THAT PART OF WARD 27, PRECINCT 34 THAT CONSISTS OF
CENSUS TRACT 2712.00, BLOCKS 3009 THROUGH 3011 AND 3014 THROUGH 3020;
(VI) THAT PART OF WARD 27, PRECINCT 37 THAT CONSISTS OF
THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 2711.01, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1005, 3000 THROUGH 3004, 3006, AND 3008 THROUGH 3013; AND
2. CENSUS TRACT 2711.02, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1011, 1014 THROUGH 1017, 1020 THROUGH 1023, 1026, AND 1027; AND
(VII) THAT PART OF WARD 27, PRECINCT 51 THAT CONSISTS OF
CENSUS TRACT 2717.00, BLOCK 1000.
(3) THE DISTRICT ALSO INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING PARTS OF
BALTIMORE COUNTY:
(I) ELECTION DISTRICTS 4, 5, 6, AND 7;
(II) ELECTION DISTRICT 2, PRECINCTS 15, 19, 21, 26, 27, AND
29;
(III) ELECTION DISTRICT 3, PRECINCTS 2 AND 5 THROUGH 16;
(IV) ELECTION DISTRICT 8, PRECINCT 17;
(V) ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 6, 10
THROUGH 14, 16, 29, AND 30;
(VI) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCT 15 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 4913.00, BLOCKS 1004 THROUGH 1015, 2000 THROUGH
2005, AND 2009 THROUGH 2012;
(VII) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCT 17 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 4912.02, BLOCKS 1001, 1002, 1011 THROUGH 1019,
1021, 1022, AND 1024;
(VIII) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCT 27 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:

SENATE BILL 888
1. CENSUS TRACT 4903.02, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1007; AND
2. CENSUS TRACT 4912.01, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1008; AND
(IX) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 10, PRECINCT 1 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 4101.00, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH 1011, 2000, 2013,
AND 2014.
(4) THE DISTRICT ALSO INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING PARTS OF
CARROLL COUNTY: ELECTION DISTRICTS 4, 5, 8, AND 14.
(5) THE DISTRICT ALSO INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING PARTS OF
HARFORD COUNTY:
(I) ELECTION DISTRICTS 4 AND 5;
(II) ELECTION DISTRICT 1, PRECINCTS 4 AND 6 THROUGH 9;
(III) ELECTION DISTRICT 3, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 8 AND 10
THROUGH 17;
(IV) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 2, PRECINCT 1 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 3021.00, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1019 AND 2000 THROUGH 2015;
2. CENSUS TRACT 3022.00, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1011, 2000 THROUGH 2014, 2021, 2022, AND 2052 THROUGH 2054; AND
3. CENSUS TRACT 3053.00, BLOCK 2020;
(V) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 2, PRECINCT 2 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 3022.00, BLOCKS 2020, 2023 THROUGH 2026, 2028,
2030, AND 2039 THROUGH 2041; AND
(VI) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 3, PRECINCT 9 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 3033.00, BLOCKS 2002, 2003, 2010
THROUGH 2016, 3000 THROUGH 3010, AND 4000 THROUGH 4011;

SENATE BILL 888 11
2. CENSUS TRACT 3034.00, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1024, 2000 THROUGH 2010, AND 3000 THROUGH 3018;
3. CENSUS TRACT 3035.01, BLOCKS 1002 AND 1017;
4. CENSUS TRACT 3035.02, BLOCKS 1002 THROUGH
1008 AND 1010; AND
5. CENSUS TRACT 3038.01, BLOCK 2030.
(6) THE DISTRICT ALSO INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING PARTS OF
HOWARD COUNTY:
(I) ELECTION DISTRICTS 2, 3, AND 4;
(II) ELECTION DISTRICT 1, PRECINCTS 4, 5, 10, 11, 19, AND 20;
AND
(III) ELECTION DISTRICT 5, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 4, 7
THROUGH 19, AND 21 THROUGH 24.
(G) (1) THE FOURTH CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT CONSISTS OF THE
FOLLOWING PARTS OF MONTGOMERY COUNTY:
(I) ELECTION DISTRICT 5, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 6, 8
THROUGH 13, 15 THROUGH 19, AND 21 THROUGH 24;
(II) ELECTION DISTRICT 13, PRECINCTS 1, 2, AND 49;
(III) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 13, PRECINCT 56 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 7032.06, BLOCK 1008;
2. CENSUS TRACT 7032.14, BLOCKS 1001, 1004, 3007,
AND 3008;
3. CENSUS TRACT 7032.15, BLOCKS 1000, 1003
THROUGH 1008, 2000 THROUGH 2005, AND 2007; AND
4. CENSUS TRACT 7032.23, BLOCKS 1005, 1006, 1012
THROUGH 1017, 1020, AND 2003; AND

SENATE BILL 888
(IV) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 13, PRECINCT 61 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 7014.07, BLOCKS 1017 AND 1020;
2. CENSUS TRACT 7032.20, BLOCKS 2003, 3000, 3001,
3003, 3004, AND 3006;
3. CENSUS TRACT 7032.21, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1007, 2000 THROUGH 2011, AND 3000 THROUGH 3010; AND
4. CENSUS TRACT 7032.23, BLOCKS 1007 THROUGH
1010.
(2) THE DISTRICT ALSO INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING PARTS OF
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY:
(I) ELECTION DISTRICTS 2, 12, 16, 17, 18, 19, AND 21;
(II) ELECTION DISTRICT 1, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 5, 7, AND 8;
(III) ELECTION DISTRICT 5, PRECINCTS 2 THROUGH 7 AND 9
THROUGH 11;
(IV) ELECTION DISTRICT 6, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 31 AND 97
THROUGH 99;
(V) ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCTS 1, 2, 4, 5, 10, 12, 13, 16,
AND 17;
(VI) ELECTION DISTRICT 13, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 3, 7, 8, 14,
16 THROUGH 20, 22, 25, 26, 28, 29, 33, 35, AND 99;
(VII) ELECTION DISTRICT 14, PRECINCTS 2, 8, 21, AND 99;
(VIII) ELECTION DISTRICT 15, PRECINCT 7;
(IX) ELECTION DISTRICT 20, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 8, 10
THROUGH 15, 18, 19, 21 THROUGH 24, 97, AND 99;
(X) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 1, PRECINCT 6 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:

SENATE BILL 888 13
1. CENSUS TRACT 8074.04, BLOCKS 2000 THROUGH
2011, 2013 THROUGH 2017, 2019 THROUGH 2021, 2035, 2036, AND 2053 THROUGH
2058; AND
2. CENSUS TRACT 8074.08, BLOCKS 1004 THROUGH
1006, 3045 THROUGH 3059, AND 3061 THROUGH 3063;
(XI) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 5, PRECINCT 8 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 8013.09, BLOCK 1011;
(XII) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCT 3 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 8019.04, BLOCKS 1006, 1012, 1013, 1015, AND 1035
THROUGH 1037;
(XIII) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 10, PRECINCT 5 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 8001.05, BLOCKS 1011 AND 2000;
2. CENSUS TRACT 8001.06, BLOCK 1011;
3. CENSUS TRACT 8002.03, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1012, 2000 THROUGH 2012, AND 2014 THROUGH 2032;
4. CENSUS TRACT 8002.12, BLOCK 1008; AND
5. CENSUS TRACT 8074.07, BLOCK 4001; AND
(XIV) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 10, PRECINCT 6 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 8074.08, BLOCK 3038.
(H) (1) THE FIFTH CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT CONSISTS OF THE
FOLLOWING COUNTIES:
(I) CALVERT COUNTY;
(II) CHARLES COUNTY; AND
(III) ST. MARY’S COUNTY.
(2) THE DISTRICT ALSO INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING PARTS OF ANNE
ARUNDEL COUNTY:

SENATE BILL 888
(I) ELECTION DISTRICT 7, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 12, 14, 16,
19, 21 THROUGH 23, AND 25;
(II) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 6, PRECINCT 24 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 9900.00, BLOCKS 28, 31, AND 32;
(III) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 7, PRECINCT 13 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 7023.00, BLOCKS 1004, 3000 THROUGH 3002, AND
3008 THROUGH 3015; AND
(IV) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 7, PRECINCT 15 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 7022.05, BLOCKS 1001 THROUGH 1005, 1009, 1010,
2009 THROUGH 2015, 2017, 2019, 2020, 2023, 2024, 3001, 3003, 3004, AND 3006
THROUGH 3009.
(3) THE DISTRICT ALSO INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING PARTS OF
PRINCE GEORGE’S COUNTY:
(I) ELECTION DISTRICTS 3, 4, 7, 8, AND 11;
(II) ELECTION DISTRICT 5, PRECINCTS 1 AND 12 THROUGH 14;
(III) ELECTION DISTRICT 6, PRECINCT 32;
(IV) ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCTS 6 THROUGH 9, 11, 14, 15,
AND 18 THROUGH 20;
(V) ELECTION DISTRICT 10, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 4 AND 7
THROUGH 14;
(VI) ELECTION DISTRICT 13, PRECINCTS 4 THROUGH 6, 9
THROUGH 13, 15, 21, 23, 24, 30 THROUGH 32, 34, AND 36;
(VII) ELECTION DISTRICT 14, PRECINCTS 1, 3 THROUGH 7, 9
THROUGH 20, AND 22 THROUGH 26;
(VIII) ELECTION DISTRICT 15, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 6 AND 8;
(IX) ELECTION DISTRICT 20, PRECINCTS 9, 16, 17, 20, 25, AND
98;
(X) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 1, PRECINCT 6 THAT

SENATE BILL 888 15
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 8074.08, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH 1003 AND 3060;
(XI) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 5, PRECINCT 8 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 8013.02, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1019 AND 2002 THROUGH 2019; AND
2. CENSUS TRACT 8013.10, BLOCKS 2007 AND 3015;
(XII) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCT 3 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 8007.01, BLOCKS 3036 AND 3037;
2. CENSUS TRACT 8011.05, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1011 AND 2000 THROUGH 2018;
3. CENSUS TRACT 8011.06, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1009, 2000 THROUGH 2003, AND 3000 THROUGH 3012;
4. CENSUS TRACT 8012.11, BLOCK 1000; AND
5. CENSUS TRACT 8022.01, BLOCK 1048;
(XIII) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 10, PRECINCT 5 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 8001.05, BLOCKS 1000 AND 1001; AND
(XIV) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 10, PRECINCT 6 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 8002.16, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1013, 2002 THROUGH 2004, 2006, AND 2021; AND
2. CENSUS TRACT 8002.18, BLOCKS 1001, 1002, AND
3000 THROUGH 3004.
(I) (1) THE SIXTH CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT CONSISTS OF THE
FOLLOWING COUNTIES:
(I) ALLEGANY COUNTY;
(II) GARRETT COUNTY; AND

SENATE BILL 888
(III) WASHINGTON COUNTY.
(2) THE DISTRICT ALSO INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING PARTS OF
FREDERICK COUNTY:
(I) ELECTION DISTRICTS 1 THROUGH 7, 10, 11, 12, 14
THROUGH 16, AND 20 THROUGH 26;
(II) ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCTS 3 AND 6;
(III) ELECTION DISTRICT 13, PRECINCT 3; AND
(IV) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 13, PRECINCT 1 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 7517.01, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1006, 1017, 1018, 1022, 2012, 2014, AND 3002;
2. CENSUS TRACT 7735.00, BLOCKS 2000, 2004, AND
2005; AND
3. CENSUS TRACT 7756.00, BLOCKS 2011, 2012, 2023,
AND 2024.
(3) THE DISTRICT ALSO INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING PARTS OF
MONTGOMERY COUNTY:
(I) ELECTION DISTRICTS 3, 10, AND 11;
(II) ELECTION DISTRICT 2, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 5, 7, 8, 10,
AND 11;
(III) ELECTION DISTRICT 4, PRECINCTS 12, 23, AND 32;
(IV) ELECTION DISTRICT 6, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 11, 13, 15,
17, AND 18;
(V) ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCTS 1, 3, 5 THROUGH 8, 10,
11, 13, 15, 16, 18, 20, 24 THROUGH 30, 34, 35, 39 THROUGH 41, 45, AND 46;
(VI) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 4, PRECINCT 20 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:

SENATE BILL 888 17
1. CENSUS TRACT 7010.02, BLOCKS 1009 THROUGH
1013, 3009, AND 3010;
2. CENSUS TRACT 7012.10, BLOCKS 2000 THROUGH
2012 AND 3000 THROUGH 3010;
3. CENSUS TRACT 7012.20, BLOCKS 1001, 1012, 1014,
1016 THROUGH 1019, 1021 THROUGH 1034, 1037 THROUGH 1041, 2001, 2027, AND
2028; AND
4. CENSUS TRACT 7060.07, BLOCK 1001;
(VII) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCT 2 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 7007.18, BLOCKS 3001 THROUGH
3015 AND 4004;
2. CENSUS TRACT 7007.27, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1010;
3. CENSUS TRACT 7007.28, BLOCKS 2000, 2001, 2013
THROUGH 2015, AND 2019 THROUGH 2024;
4. CENSUS TRACT 7007.31, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1018;
5. CENSUS TRACT 7007.32, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1018 AND 2000 THROUGH 2005;
6. CENSUS TRACT 7008.37, BLOCKS 1000 AND 3000; AND
7. CENSUS TRACT 7008.39, BLOCKS 3000, 3001, 3007,
AND 3008;
(VIII) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCT 32 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 7007.29, BLOCK 1004; AND
(IX) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCT 44 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 7008.28, BLOCKS 1014 AND 1018.
(J) (1) THE SEVENTH CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT CONSISTS OF THE

SENATE BILL 888
FOLLOWING PARTS OF BALTIMORE CITY:
(I) WARDS 4, 5, 7, 8, 9, 10, 11, 14, 15, 16, 17, 18, 19, 20, 22, AND
28;
(II) WARD 3, PRECINCTS 1 AND 2;
(III) WARD 6, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 4;
(IV) WARD 12, PRECINCTS 2, 3, AND 5 THROUGH 13;
(V) WARD 13, PRECINCTS 5 THROUGH 11 AND 13;
(VI) WARD 21, PRECINCTS 1, 2, 3, AND 5;
(VII) WARD 25, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 4 AND 17;
(VIII) WARD 26, PRECINCTS 15 THROUGH 33;
(IX) WARD 27, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 33, 35, 36, 48, 52
THROUGH 61, AND 68;
(X) THAT PART OF WARD 12, PRECINCT 1 THAT CONSISTS OF
THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 1201.00, BLOCKS 1004 THROUGH
1010 AND 1012 THROUGH 1024; AND
2. CENSUS TRACT 2711.02, BLOCK 1029;
(XI) THAT PART OF WARD 12, PRECINCT 4 THAT CONSISTS OF
THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 1202.01, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1017; AND
2. CENSUS TRACT 1202.02, BLOCKS 1001 THROUGH
1003, 2000 THROUGH 2004, AND 3000 THROUGH 3008;
(XII) THAT PART OF WARD 21, PRECINCT 4 THAT CONSISTS OF
THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 2101.00, BLOCKS 1003 THROUGH

SENATE BILL 888 19
1011, 1015 THROUGH 1028, 1030 THROUGH 1038, AND 1043;
2. CENSUS TRACT 2102.00, BLOCKS 1027 AND 1030
THROUGH 1035; AND
3. CENSUS TRACT 2503.01, BLOCKS 1003, 1007, 1008,
1035, AND 2000 THROUGH 2002;
(XIII) THAT PART OF WARD 27, PRECINCT 34 THAT CONSISTS OF
THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 2708.05, BLOCKS 3000 THROUGH
3009 AND 4001 THROUGH 4009; AND
2. CENSUS TRACT 2710.02, BLOCKS 3000 AND 3001;
(XIV) THAT PART OF WARD 27, PRECINCT 37 THAT CONSISTS OF
CENSUS TRACT 2711.02, BLOCKS 1018 AND 1019; AND
(XV) THAT PART OF WARD 27, PRECINCT 51 THAT CONSISTS OF
CENSUS TRACT 2717.00, BLOCK 1001.
(2) THE DISTRICT ALSO INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING PARTS OF
BALTIMORE COUNTY:
(I) ELECTION DISTRICT 14;
(II) ELECTION DISTRICT 1, PRECINCTS 1, 5 THROUGH 9, 16, 19,
21, 23, AND 24;
(III) ELECTION DISTRICT 2, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 7, 9, 10, 22,
23, 28, 31, AND 33;
(IV) ELECTION DISTRICT 3, PRECINCTS 1, 3, AND 4;
(V) ELECTION DISTRICT 8, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 16 AND 18
THROUGH 30;
(VI) ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCTS 7 THROUGH 9, 18
THROUGH 26, 28, AND 31 THROUGH 33;
(VII) ELECTION DISTRICT 10, PRECINCTS 2 THROUGH 6;

SENATE BILL 888
(VIII) ELECTION DISTRICT 11, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 23, 25, AND
26;
(IX) ELECTION DISTRICT 13, PRECINCT 1;
(X) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCT 15 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 4914.01, BLOCKS 2010, 2011, 2015, 3000, 3001, AND
3004 THROUGH 3007;
(XI) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCT 17 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 4912.01, BLOCK 1017;
2. CENSUS TRACT 4912.02, BLOCKS 1000, 1023, AND
1025;
3. CENSUS TRACT 4915.00, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1011 AND 3000; AND
4. CENSUS TRACT 4916.00, BLOCKS 3008, 3009, 3016,
AND 3017;
(XII) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCT 27 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 4916.00, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH 1004, 1006, AND
1007; AND
(XIII) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 10, PRECINCT 1 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 4101.00, BLOCKS 2001 THROUGH 2012, 2015 THROUGH
2023, 3000 THROUGH 3004, 3012, AND 3017 THROUGH 3022.
(K) (1) THE EIGHTH CONGRESSIONAL DISTRICT CONSISTS OF THE
FOLLOWING PARTS OF CARROLL COUNTY: ELECTION DISTRICTS 1 THROUGH 3, 6, 7,
AND 9 THROUGH 13.
(2) THE DISTRICT ALSO INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING PARTS OF
FREDERICK COUNTY:
(I) ELECTION DISTRICTS 8 AND 17 THROUGH 19;
(II) ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCTS 1, 2, 4, 5, AND 7; AND
(III) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 13, PRECINCT 1 THAT

SENATE BILL 888 21
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 7517.01, BLOCKS 1016, 2003, 2009
THROUGH 2011, 2013, 2016, 2017, 3000, 3001, AND 3003 THROUGH 3005;
2. CENSUS TRACT 7517.02, BLOCKS 1015, 1016, 3015,
AND 3016;
3. CENSUS TRACT 7519.05, BLOCK 3009; AND
4. CENSUS TRACT 7756.00, BLOCKS 1000 THROUGH
1014, 2000 THROUGH 2007, 2010, AND 3000 THROUGH 3009.
(3) THE DISTRICT ALSO INCLUDES THE FOLLOWING PARTS OF
MONTGOMERY COUNTY:
(I) ELECTION DISTRICTS 1, 7, 8, AND 12;
(II) ELECTION DISTRICT 2, PRECINCTS 6 AND 12;
(III) ELECTION DISTRICT 4, PRECINCTS 1 THROUGH 11, 13
THROUGH 19, 21, 24 THROUGH 28, 30, 31, 33, 34, 38, 42, AND 43;
(IV) ELECTION DISTRICT 5, PRECINCT 14;
(V) ELECTION DISTRICT 6, PRECINCT 14;
(VI) ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCTS 4, 9, 12, 14, 21, 22, 31,
33, 36 THROUGH 38, 42, 43, AND 47;
(VII) ELECTION DISTRICT 13, PRECINCTS 3 THROUGH 8, 10, 11,
13 THROUGH 16, 18 THROUGH 25, 27 THROUGH 29, 31 THROUGH 40, 42 THROUGH
47, 50 THROUGH 55, 57 THROUGH 59, 63 THROUGH 65, 67 THROUGH 69, AND 71;
(VIII) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 4, PRECINCT 20 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 7012.20, BLOCK 1010;
(IX) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCT 2 THAT
CONSISTS OF CENSUS TRACT 7007.18, BLOCKS 1003, 1004, 4000 THROUGH 4003,
AND 4012;
(X) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCT 32 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:

SENATE BILL 888
1. CENSUS TRACT 7007.20, BLOCKS 2006 AND 3002
THROUGH 3005; AND
2. CENSUS TRACT 7007.29, BLOCKS 1005 AND 1007;
(XI) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 9, PRECINCT 44 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 7008.36, BLOCK 2000; AND
2. CENSUS TRACT 7008.38, BLOCKS 2002 THROUGH
2008, 2012, AND 2013;
(XII) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 13, PRECINCT 56 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 7032.14, BLOCKS 3001 THROUGH
3006; AND
2. CENSUS TRACT 7032.15, BLOCKS 1001 AND 1002; AND
(XIII) THAT PART OF ELECTION DISTRICT 13, PRECINCT 61 THAT
CONSISTS OF THE FOLLOWING:
1. CENSUS TRACT 7013.08, BLOCK 1004;
2. CENSUS TRACT 7032.16, BLOCK 2001;
3. CENSUS TRACT 7032.19, BLOCK 1000; AND
4. CENSUS TRACT 7032.20, BLOCKS 2000 THROUGH
2002, 2004 THROUGH 2008, 3002, AND 3005.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section(s) 8–702 through
8–709 of Article – Election Law of the Annotated Code of Maryland be repealed.
SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That the General Assembly
determines that the amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act affects multiple jurisdictions and that the provisions of Article XIV, § 1 of the Maryland
Constitution concerning local approval of constitutional amendments do not apply.
SECTION 4. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That:

SENATE BILL 888 23
(a) The amendment to the Maryland Constitution proposed by Section 1 of this
Act shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State at the next general election to be
held in November 2026 for adoption or rejection in accordance with Article XIV of the
Maryland Constitution.
(b) (1) At that general election, the vote on the proposed amendment to the
Constitution shall be by ballot, and on each ballot there shall be printed the words “For the
Constitutional Amendment” and “Against the Constitutional Amendment”, as now
provided by law.
(2) At that general election, a question substantially similar to the
following shall be submitted to the qualified voters of the State:
“Question ___ – Constitutional Amendment
The proposed Constitutional Amendment enacts a Congressional Districting Plan
for use beginning after the 2026 election and until a new Congressional Districting Plan
takes effect after the 2030 census; and authorizes the General Assembly to grant original
jurisdiction to the Supreme Court of Maryland to review the congressional districting of the
State; and clarifies that certain standards in the Maryland Constitution apply only to
districts used to elect members of the General Assembly.”.
(c) Immediately after the election, all returns shall be made to the Governor of
the vote for and against the proposed amendment, as directed by Article XIV of the
Maryland Constitution, and further proceedings held in accordance with Article XIV.
SECTION 5. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That Section 2 of this Act is
contingent on the passage of Section 1 of this Act, a constitutional amendment, and its
ratification by voters of the State.
SECTION 6. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 5 of this
Act, Section 2 of this Act shall take effect on the proclamation of the Governor that the
constitutional amendment, having received a majority of the votes cast at the general
election has been adopted by the people of Maryland.